Utah statutes.
23-19-14.5.   Persons participating in youth organization activity authorized to fish without license.

(1)  As used in this section, "youth organization" means:

(a)  the Boy Scouts of America;

(b)  the Girls Scouts of the USA; or

(c)  an organization that:

(i)  is exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3), Internal Revenue Code; and

(ii)  promotes character building through outdoor activities.

(2)  The Division of Wildlife Resources shall permit a resident to fish without a license during a youth organization activity if:

(a)  the resident is:

(i)  a member of a youth organization; and

(ii)  younger than 14 years old;

(b)  the fishing is in compliance with all fishing statutes and rules; and

(c)  the adult leader obtains from the youth organization:

(i)  a valid tour permit; or

(ii)  official documentation that specifies:

(A)  the date and place of the fishing;

(B)  the name of the adult leader that will supervise the fishing; and

(C)  that the activity is officially sanctioned by the youth organization.

(3) (a)  The adult leader shall instruct the members on fishing statutes and rules.

(b)  The division shall provide educational materials on its website to assist the adult leader in complying with Subsection (3)(a).

(4)  By following the procedures and requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the Wildlife Board shall adopt rules specifying the form of the official documentation required by Subsection (2)(c)(ii).

